Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.040

Fees established by rule—Deposit—Use—Failure to pay.

(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing fees to recover the costs of providing ginseng certification activities authorized under this chapter. All moneys collected under this chapter shall be paid to the director, deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) In addition to other penalties, the director may refuse to perform any inspection or certification service authorized under this chapter for any person in arrears unless the person makes payment in full prior to performing the service.

[ 1998 c 154 s 24.]